Utah statutes.
59-7-602.   Credit for cash contributions to sheltered workshops.
(1)  For tax years beginning January 1, 1983, and thereafter, in computing the
tax due the state of Utah pursuant to Section 59-7-104, there shall be a tax
credit allowed for cash contributions made within the taxable year to
nonprofit rehabilitation sheltered workshop facilities for the disabled
operating in Utah which are certified by the Department of Human Services as a
qualifying facility.  The allowable credit is an amount equal to 50% of the
aggregate amount of the cash contributions to qualifying rehabilitation
facilities, but in no case shall the credit allowed exceed $1,000.
(2)  If a taxpayer has subtracted an amount for cash contributions to a
sheltered workshop when determining federal taxable income, that amount shall
be added back under Section 59-7-105 before a credit may be taken under this
section.
